Utah statutes.
58-1-404.   Diversion -- Procedure.
(1)  As used in this section, "diversion" means suspending action to
discipline a licensee  who is or could be charged in a Notice of Agency Action
with certain offenses within the category of unprofessional or unlawful
conduct on the condition that the licensee agrees to participate in an
educational or rehabilitation program or fulfill some other condition.
(2) (a) (i)  The director may establish, as circumstances require, a diversion
advisory committee for each occupation or profession or similar groups of
occupations or professions licensed by the division.
(ii)  The committees shall assist the director in the administration of this
section.
(b) (i)  Each committee shall consist of at least three licensees from the
same or similar occupation or profession as the person whose conduct is the
subject of the committee's consideration.
(ii)  The director shall appoint the members of a diversion advisory committee
from nominations submitted by the corresponding board established for the same
or similar occupation or profession under Section 58-1-201 or from other
qualified nominees developed by or submitted to the division.
(iii)  Committee members may not serve concurrently as members of the
corresponding board.
(iv)  Committee members shall serve voluntarily without remuneration.
(v)  The director may:
(A)  dissolve any diversion advisory committee;
(B)  remove or request the replacement of any member of a committee; and
(C)  establish any procedure that is necessary and proper for a committee's
administration.
(3)  The director may, after consultation with the appropriate diversion
advisory committee and by written agreement with the licensee, divert the
licensee to a diversion program:
(a)  at any time after receipt by the division of a complaint against the
licensee when no adjudicative proceeding has been commenced;
(b)  at any time prior to the conclusion of a hearing under Section 63G-4-206
when an adjudicative proceeding has been commenced against the licensee; or
(c)  after a self-referral by a licensee who is not the subject of a current
investigation, complaint, or adjudicative proceeding.
(4) (a)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act, the division shall define by rule the particular offenses
within the category of unprofessional or unlawful conduct which may be subject
to diversion.
(b)  A licensee may be eligible for a diversion program only once for the same
or similar offense, whether the diversion program was in this state or another
jurisdiction, and is not eligible if previously disciplined by the division,
by a licensing agency of another state, or by a federal government agency for
the same or a similar offense.
(c)  The term of a diversion agreement shall be five years or less, but may be
extended for an additional period of time as agreed to by the parties in
writing.
(d)  A decision by the director not to divert a licensee is not subject to
appeal or judicial review.
(5)  A licensee may be represented by counsel:
(a)  during the negotiations for diversion;
(b)  at the time of the execution of the diversion agreement; and
(c)  at any hearing before the director relating to a diversion program.
(6) (a)  As used in this section, "diversion agreement" means a written
agreement between the division, through its director, and the licensee, which
specifies formal terms and conditions the licensee must fulfill in order to
comply with the diversion program.
(b) (i)  A diversion agreement shall contain a full detailed statement of the
requirements agreed to by the licensee and a full detailed stipulation of the
facts upon which the diversion agreement is premised.
(ii)  The facts stipulated in the diversion agreement shall constitute binding
admissions of the licensee:
(A)  in any proceeding under Subsection (6)(c) or (6)(d) to terminate the
diversion agreement and impose disciplinary sanctions against the licensee;
and
(B)  in any disciplinary proceeding based on unprofessional or unlawful
conduct that is not the basis of the diversion agreement.
(c)  The diversion agreement shall provide that if the licensee makes an
intentional material misrepresentation of fact in the stipulation of facts
contained in the diversion agreement, the director shall initiate the
procedures set forth in Subsection (13) to terminate the diversion agreement
and issue an order of license revocation.
(d) (i)  The diversion agreement shall provide that if the licensee fails to
comply with its terms, the director shall initiate the procedures set forth in
Subsection (14) to terminate the diversion agreement and issue an order of
license suspension, which shall be stayed in favor of an order of probation
having the same terms as those which comprised the diversion agreement.
(ii)  The division may waive and not include as probationary requirements any
terms of the diversion agreement it does not consider necessary to protect the
public.
(iii)  The term of the order of probation shall be as provided in Subsection
(14)(c)(ii).
(e)  The division director may not approve a diversion agreement unless the
licensee, as part of the diversion agreement:
(i)  knowingly and intelligently waives the right to a hearing under Title
63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, for the conduct upon which the
diversion agreement was premised;
(ii)  agrees to be subject to the procedures and remedies set forth in this
section;
(iii)  acknowledges an understanding of the consequences of making an
intentional misrepresentation of fact in the stipulation of facts contained in
the diversion agreement; and
(iv)  acknowledges an understanding of the consequences of failing to comply
with the terms of the diversion agreement.
(7) (a)  If the division and the licensee enter into a diversion agreement
after the division has commenced an adjudicative proceeding against the
licensee, the director shall stay that proceeding pending completion of the
diversion agreement.
(b)  The order staying the adjudicative proceeding shall be filed in that
proceeding and may reference the diversion agreement.
(8) (a)  Upon successful completion of a diversion agreement, the director
shall dismiss any charges under the director's jurisdiction of unprofessional
or unlawful conduct that were filed against the licensee.
(b)  Whether or not an adjudicative proceeding had been commenced against the
licensee, the division may not thereafter subject the licensee to disciplinary
action for the conduct which formed the basis of the completed diversion
agreement.
(c)  Neither the execution of a diversion agreement nor the dismissal of filed
charges constitute disciplinary action, and no report of either may be made to
disciplinary databases.
(d)  The division may consider the completion of a diversion program and the
contents of the diversion agreement in determining the appropriate
disciplinary action if the licensee is charged in the future with the same or
similar conduct.
(e)  The order of dismissal shall be filed in the adjudicative proceeding in
which the misconduct was charged and may reference the diversion agreement.
(9) (a)  Acceptance of the licensee into diversion does not preclude the
division from investigating or continuing to investigate the licensee for any
unlawful or unprofessional conduct committed before, during, or after
participation in the diversion program.
(b)  Acceptance of the licensee into diversion does not preclude the division
from taking disciplinary action or continuing to take disciplinary action
against the licensee for unlawful or unprofessional conduct committed before,
during, or after participation in the diversion program, except for that
conduct which formed the basis for the diversion agreement.
(c)  Any licensee terminated from the diversion program for failure to comply
with the diversion agreement is subject to disciplinary action by the division
for acts committed before, during, and after participation in the diversion
program, including violations identified in the diversion agreement.
(10)  The classification, retention, and disclosure of records relating to a
licensee's participation in the diversion program is governed by Title 63G,
Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, except that any
provision in the diversion agreement which addresses access to or release of
diversion records regarding the licensee shall govern the access to and
release of those records.
(11)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the fact that the
licensee completed a diversion program and the contents of the diversion
agreement itself may be considered by the division in determining the
appropriate disciplinary action if the licensee is charged in the future with
the same or similar conduct.
(12)  Meetings regarding the diversion program are not subject to Title 52,
Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act.
(13) (a)  If, during the course of the diversion agreement, information is
brought to the attention of the director that the licensee made an intentional
material misrepresentation of fact in the stipulation of facts contained in
the diversion agreement, the director shall cause to be served upon the
licensee an order to show cause specifying the information relied upon by the
director and setting a time and place for hearing to determine whether or not
the licensee made the intentional material misrepresentation of fact and
whether the agreement should be terminated on that ground.
(b)  Proceedings to terminate a diversion agreement on the grounds that the
licensee made an intentional material misrepresentation of fact in the
stipulation of facts contained in the diversion agreement and to issue an
order of license revocation shall comply with Title 63G, Chapter 4,
Administrative Procedures Act, except as follows:
(i)  the notice of agency action shall be in the form of an order to show
cause, which shall contain all of the information specified in Subsection
63G-4-201(2), except a statement that a written response to the order to show
cause is required;
(ii)  no written response to the order to show cause is required;
(iii)  discovery is prohibited, but the division may issue subpoenas or other
orders to compel production of necessary evidence on behalf of either party
and all parties shall have access to information contained in the division's
diversion file to the extent permitted by law;
(iv)  the hearing shall be held only after timely notice to all parties; and
(v)  any agency review or reconsideration of an order terminating a diversion
agreement or of an order of license revocation pursuant to this Subsection
(13) shall be limited to the division director's findings of fact, conclusions
of law, and order which arose out of the order to show cause proceeding.
(c)  Upon finding the licensee made an intentional material misrepresentation
of fact in the stipulation of facts contained in the diversion agreement and
that terminating the agreement is in the best interest of the public, and
issuing an order to that effect, the director shall issue an order of license
revocation, revoking the licensee's professional license.
(d)  The order terminating the diversion agreement and the order of license
revocation shall include findings of fact and conclusions of law as determined
by the director following the hearing or as otherwise stipulated and agreed to
by the parties.
(e)  If the diversion agreement being terminated was entered into after the
division had commenced an adjudicative proceeding against the licensee, that
adjudicative proceeding shall be considered to be merged into the order of
license revocation and it may not constitute a basis for any separate
disciplinary action against the licensee.
(f)  The order terminating the diversion agreement and the order of license
revocation shall notify the licensee of the right to request agency review or
reconsideration.
(14) (a)  If, during the course of the diversion agreement, information is
brought to the attention of the director that the licensee has violated the
diversion agreement and if it appears in the best interest of the public to
proceed with charges, the director, after consultation with the diversion
advisory committee, shall cause to be served upon the licensee an order to
show cause specifying the facts relied upon by the director and setting a time
and place for hearing to determine whether or not the licensee has violated
the diversion agreement and whether the agreement should be terminated.
(b)  Proceedings to terminate a diversion agreement and to issue an order of
license suspension and probation, and proceedings to terminate the probation
and lift the stay of a license suspension, shall comply with Title 63G,
Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, except as follows:
(i)  the notice of agency action shall be in the form of an order to show
cause, which shall contain all of the information specified in Subsection
63G-4-201(2), except a statement that a written response to the order to show
cause is required;
(ii)  no written response to the order to show cause shall be required;
(iii)  discovery is prohibited, but the division may issue subpoenas or other
orders to compel production of necessary evidence on behalf of either party
and all parties shall have access to information contained in the division's
diversion file to the extent permitted by law;
(iv)  the hearing shall be held only after timely notice to all parties; and
(v)  any agency review or reconsideration of an order terminating a diversion
agreement or of an order of license suspension and probation pursuant to this
Subsection (14) shall be limited to the division director's findings of fact,
conclusions of law, and order which arose out of the order to show cause
proceeding.
(c) (i)  Upon finding the licensee has violated the diversion agreement and
that terminating the agreement is in the best interest of the public, and
issuing an order to that effect, the director shall issue an order of license
suspension, suspending the licensee's professional license, but shall stay
that suspension in favor of an order of probation, consisting of the same
terms as those which comprised the diversion agreement.
(ii)  The period of probation shall be the time period which remained under
the diversion agreement, or five years from the date of the order of license
suspension and probation, whichever is longer, unless otherwise agreed by the
parties.
(iii)  The period of probation is tolled during any time in which the licensee
does not have an active license in the state.
(d) (i)  The order terminating the diversion agreement and the order of
license suspension and probation shall include findings of fact and
conclusions of law as determined by the director following the hearing or as
otherwise stipulated and agreed to by the parties.
(ii)  The findings of fact may include those facts to which the licensee
stipulated in the diversion agreement and any additional facts as the director
may determine in the course of the hearing.
(e)  If the diversion agreement being terminated was entered into after the
division had commenced an adjudicative proceeding against the licensee, that
adjudicative proceeding shall be considered to be merged into the order of
license suspension and probation and it may not constitute a basis for any
separate disciplinary action against the licensee.
(f)  The order terminating the diversion agreement and the order of license
suspension and probation shall notify the licensee of the right to request
agency review or reconsideration.
(g) (i)  The terms and conditions of the order of license suspension and
probation may be amended by order of the director, pursuant to motion or
stipulation of the parties.
(ii)  The order of the director on the motion shall not be subject to agency
review, but is subject to agency reconsideration under Section 63G-4-302.
(h) (i)  If, during the course of probation, the director has reason to
believe the licensee has violated the order of suspension and probation, the
director shall cause to be served upon the licensee an order to show cause why
the probation should not be terminated and the stay of suspension lifted.
(ii)  The order to show cause shall specify the facts relied upon by the
director and shall set a time and place for hearing before the director to
determine whether or not the licensee has violated the order of suspension and
probation and whether that order should be terminated and the stay of
suspension lifted.
(15) (a)  Nothing in this section precludes the division from issuing an
emergency order pursuant to Section 63G-4-502.
(b)  If the division issues an emergency order against a licensee who is
subject to a diversion agreement with the division, that diversion agreement
shall be immediately and automatically terminated upon the issuance of the
emergency order, without compliance with the provisions of Title 63G, Chapter
4, Administrative Procedures Act.
(c) (i)  A licensee whose diversion agreement has been terminated pursuant to
Subsection (15)(b) is entitled, upon request, to a posttermination hearing to
challenge the termination of the diversion agreement.
(ii)  The request shall be considered a request for agency action and shall
comply with the requirements of Subsection 63G-4-201(3).
(iii)  The division shall uphold the termination of the diversion agreement if
it finds that:
(A)  the licensee violated the diversion agreement; and
(B)  it is in the best interest of the public to terminate the diversion
agreement.
(16)  The administrative statute of limitations for taking disciplinary action
described in Subsection 58-1-401(5) shall be tolled during a diversion
program.
